Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1079.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin SOUTH ST. PAUL; DRINKING WATER INFRASTRUCTURE.new text end new text begin $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the Public Facilities Authority for a grant to the city of South St. Paul to design, construct, and equip the replacement of drinking water infrastructure to address pressure fluctuations and reduced flow issues. This appropriation is available after the commissioner of management and budget determines that an amount sufficient to complete the project has been committed to the project, as required by Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.502. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until the project is completed or abandoned subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end